Hawaii statutes.
§207-12 Exemptions and immunities. A
foreign lender which (1) does not maintain a place of business in this State,
(2) conducts its principal activities outside this State, and (3) complies with
this part, does not by engaging in this State in any or all of the activities
specified in section 207-13, violate the laws of this State relating to doing
business or doing a banking, trust, or insurance business, or become subject to
chapter 412, 414, or 431, or become subject to any taxation which would otherwise
be imposed for doing business in or doing a banking, trust, or insurance
business in, or having gross income or receipts from sources in, property in,
or the conduct of any activity in, this State, or become subject to any
taxation under chapter 235, 237, or 241, and no income or receipts of any
foreign lender arising out of any of the activities specified in the following
section shall constitute income from sources in, property in, or activities
conducted in this State for the purposes of any tax imposed by this State;
provided that nothing in this part shall be construed to exempt the real
property of a foreign lender from taxation to the same extent, according to its
value, as other real property is taxed, or to preclude the inclusion of the
dividends or other income from foreign lenders in the income of individuals
taxable under chapter 235 to the same extent as is included dividends and other
income from domestic lenders; and provided further that if any such foreign
lender shall acquire any property in this State in enforcement of the rights of
the foreign lender in the event of a default by any borrower, as permitted by
section 207-13(4), then commencing one year after title to such property has
vested in the foreign lender, the rents or other receipts received by the
foreign lender from, and the proceeds of sale by the foreign lender of, such
property shall be subject to taxation under chapters 235 and 237 in the same
manner and to the same extent as if the rents, other receipts, or proceeds were
received by a resident of this State; and provided further that if any such
foreign lender shall otherwise acquire any property in this State or engage in
any business or activities in this State not specified in section 207-13, then
the rents and other receipts received by the foreign lender from such property
and the proceeds of sale by the foreign lender of such property and all income
and receipts from the foreign lender's business or activities in this State not
specified in section 207-13 shall be subject to taxation under chapters 235 and
237 in the same manner and to the same extent as if such rents, other receipts,
proceeds, and income were received by a resident of this State, but such other
activities and business shall not deprive the foreign lender of the immunities
and exemptions from taxation hereinabove stated with respect to the activities
specified in section 207-13. [L 1961, c 194, §9; Supp, §98L-9; HRS §207-12; am
L 1977, c 39, §1; am L 1983, c 167, §3; am L 1985, c 270, §4; am L 1993, c 350,
§9; am L 2002, c 40, §5]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next